src/morphology/affixes/digits.lexc
LEXICON DIGITS_SATA
!! The digit string ending in 00 pronounced as hundreds
!!€ 100:
!!€ 100:t:
!!€ 100:aa:
0  DIGITS_COMPOUND   ;
+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_BACK_POSS    ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_BACK_CLIT   ;
+Pl+Nom:%:t DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Gen:%:n DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%:aa    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:aan   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%:tta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:lta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:lla   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%:lle   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:sta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:na    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:ssa   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:ksi   DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%:kse   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%:ja    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:iin   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%:itta  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:ilta  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:illa  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%:ille  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:ina   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%:ine  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:ista  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:issa  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:in    DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:iksi  DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:ikse  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OBL    ;

LEXICON DIGITS_TUHAT
!! The digit string ending in 000 pronounced as thousands
!!€ 1000:
!!€ 1000:t:
!!€ 1000:ta:
0  DIGITS_COMPOUND   ;
+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_BACK_POSS    ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_BACK_CLIT   ;
+Pl+Nom:%:t DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Gen:%:n DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%:ta    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:een   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%:tta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:lta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:lla   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%:lle   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:stä   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:na    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:ssa   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:ksi   DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%:kse   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%:ia    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:iin   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%:itta  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:ilta  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:illa  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%:ille  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:ina   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%:ine  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:ista  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:issa  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:in    DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:iksi  DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:ikse  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OBL    ;

LEXICON DIGITS_MILJOONA
!! The digit string ending in 0's pronounced as millions
!!€ 1000000:
!!€ 1000000:t:
!!€ 1000000:aa:
0  DIGITS_COMPOUND   ;
+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_BACK_POSS    ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_BACK_CLIT   ;
+Pl+Nom:%:t DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Gen:%:n DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%:aa    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:aan   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%:tta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:lta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:lla   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%:lle   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:sta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:na    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:ssa   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:ksi   DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%:kse   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%:ia    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:iin   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%:itta  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:ilta  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:illa  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%:ille  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:ina   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%:ine  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:ista  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:issa  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:in    DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:iksi  DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:ikse  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OBL    ;

LEXICON DIGITS_MILJARDI
!! The digit string ending in 0's pronounced as milliards
!!€ 1000000000:
!!€ 1000000000:t:
!!€ 1000000000:a:
0  DIGITS_COMPOUND   ;
+Sg+Nom:0    #   ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_BACK_POSS    ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  DIGITS_BACK_CLIT   ;
+Pl+Nom:%:t DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Gen:%:n DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%:a     DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:iin   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%:tta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:lta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:lla   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%:lle   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:sta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:na    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:ssa   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:ksi   DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%:kse   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%:ja    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:iin   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%:itta  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:ilta  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:illa  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%:ille  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:ina   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%:ine  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:ista  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:issa  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:in    DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:iksi  DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:ikse  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OBL    ;

LEXICON DIGITS_ENSIMMÄINEN
!! The digit string ending in 1. pronounced as first
!!€ 1.:
!!€ 1:nen:
!!€ 1:stä:
+Sg+Nom:.    #   ;
+Sg+Gen:%:nen  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_OPT    ;
+Pl+Nom:%:set DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Nom:%:sen DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%:stä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:seen   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%:settä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:seltä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:sellä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%:selle   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:sestä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:senä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:sessä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:seksi   DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%:sekse   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%:siä    DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:siin   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%:sittä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:siltä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:sillä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%:sille  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:sinä   DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%:sine  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:sistä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:sissä  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:sin    DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:siksi  DIGITS_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:sikse  DIGITS_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OBL    ;

LEXICON DIGITS_TOINEN
!! The digit string ending in 2. pronounced as second
!!€ 2.:
!!€ 2:nen:
!!€ 2:sta:
+Sg+Nom:.    #   ;
+Sg+Gen:%:nen  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT    ;
+Pl+Nom:%:set DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Nom:%:sen DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Par:%:sta    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:seen   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
+Sg+Abe:%:setta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:selta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:sella   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+All:%:selle   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:sesta   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:sena    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:sessa   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:seksi   DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Sg+Tra:%:sekse   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL    ;
+Pl+Par:%:sia    DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:siin   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_OPT ;
+Pl+Abe:%:sitta  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:silta  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:silla  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+All:%:sille  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:sina   DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Cmt:%:sine  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:sista  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:sisss  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:sin    DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:siksi  DIGITS_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
+Pl+Tra:%:sikse  DIGITS_BACK_POSS_AN_OBL    ;
